Hawaii statutes.
[§651C-2] Insolvency. (a) A debtor is
insolvent if the sum of the debtor's debts is greater than all of the debtor's
assets, at a fair valuation.

(b) A debtor who is generally not paying his
or her debts as they become due is presumed to be insolvent.

(c) A partnership is insolvent under
subsection (a) if the sum of the partnership's debts is greater than the
aggregate, at a fair valuation, of all of the partnership's assets, and the sum
of the excess of the value of each general partner's nonpartnership assets over
the partner's nonpartnership debts.

(d) Assets under this section do not include
property that has been transferred, concealed, or removed with intent to
hinder, delay, or defraud creditors or that has been transferred in a manner
making the transfer voidable under this chapter.

(e) Debts under this section do not include an
obligation to the extent it is secured by a valid lien on property of the
debtor not included as an asset. [L 1985, c 216, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next